Arkansas, session 2025, HB1192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-21-609(b), concerning the prohibition
against smoking tobacco, the use of tobacco or tobacco products, or the use
of e-cigarettes at a public school, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Smoking tobacco, the use of tobacco or tobacco products, or the
use of e-cigarettes is prohibited:
(1)(A) In or on real property owned or leased by a public
school district, including a or an open-enrollment public charter school; or
and
(2)(B) In or on personal property, including without
*TNL035*
02-27-2025 11:01:57 TNL035

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1192
limitation school buses, owned or leased by a public school district,
including a or an open-enrollment public charter school.
(2) The use or possession of tobacco or tobacco products by a
public school student or the use or possession of e-cigarettes by a public
school student is prohibited:
(A) In or on real property owned or leased by a public
school district or an open-enrollment public charter school; and
(B) In or on personal property, including without
limitation school buses, owned or leased by a public school district or an
open-enrollment public charter school.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-21-609, concerning the prohibition
against smoking, the use of tobacco or tobacco products, or the use of e-
cigarettes, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(e)(1) The parent, legal guardian, or person standing in loco parentis
to a student who is found by the public school district or open-enrollment
public charter school to have violated this section shall be subject to the
following fines upon the student being found guilty of having violated this
section:
(A) One hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense;
(B) Five hundred dollars ($500) for the second offense;
and
(C) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for a third or
subsequent offense.
(2) Any fines collected under subdivision (e)(1) of this section
shall be paid to the police department of the town or city in which the
public school district or open-enrollment public charter school is located.
(3) However, this subsection shall not apply to a student who is
in the custody of the Division of Children and Family Services or the
Division of Youth Services.

/s/Pilkington




02-27-2025 11:01:57 TNL035